Utah statutes.
62A-6-116.   Unauthorized sterilization -- Criminal penalty.

Except as authorized by this chapter, any person who intentionally performs, encourages, assists in, or otherwise promotes the performance of a sterilization procedure for the purpose of destroying the power to procreate the human species, with knowledge that the provisions of this chapter have not been met, is guilty of a third degree felony.

